Utah statutes.
58-55-312.   Interim and temporary permits for alarm company agents.
(1)  Upon receipt of a complete application for licensure in accordance with
Section 58-55-302, an applicant for licensure as an alarm company agent may be
issued:
(a)  an interim permit; or
(b)  subject to Subsection (3), a temporary permit.
(2) (a)  Each interim permit shall expire 90 days after it is issued or on the
date on which the applicant is issued a license, whichever is earlier.
(b)  The division may reissue an interim permit if the delay in approving a
license is beyond the control or influence of the interim permit holder.
(3) (a)  The division may issue a temporary permit to an applicant for a
license as an alarm company agent if:
(i)  the division has received a background check on the applicant from the
Bureau of Criminal Identification;
(ii) (A)  the applicant is or will be employed at a call center, office, or
administrative facility of an alarm company; and
(B)  the applicant's only contact with a customer or potential customer of the
alarm company is:
(I)  from the call center, office, or administrative facility; and
(II)  by telephone or other remote communication method; and
(iii)  the alarm company by which the applicant is or will be employed affirms
in writing to the division that the applicant, if issued a temporary license,
will act only within the scope of the temporary license, as provided in
Subsection (3)(a)(ii).
(b)  A temporary license under this section expires the earliest of:
(i)  90 days after it is issued;
(ii)  the date on which the individual to whom the temporary license is issued
leaves the employment of the alarm company that employs the individual at the
time the temporary license is issued; and
(iii)  the date on which the division issues a regular license to the
applicant or denies the applicant's application.
(4)  An interim permit holder may engage in the scope of an alarm company
agent.
